New York, session 2025-2026, A10314.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 396-bbb to read as follows: 3 § 396-bbb. Certain wasteful marketing strategies prohibited. No person 4 or entity shall use any marketing strategy intended to solicit a 5 subscription to any commercial service by attaching any wasteful addi- 6 tional materials, such as a card that mimics the appearance of a payment 7 card, to a formal letter, if such formal letter contains information 8 about the service being marketed and such additional materials do not 9 provide any additional information about such service not already 10 included in such formal letter. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14561-01-6